src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    hjarta+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: hjarta
    hjarta+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: hjarta
    hjarta+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: hjarta
    hjarta+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: hjarta
    hjarta+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: [hjørtu, hjørtur]
    hjarta+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: [hjørtu, hjørtur]
    hjarta+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: hjørtum
    hjarta+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: hjartna
    hjarta+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: hjartað
    hjarta+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: hjartað
    hjarta+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: hjartanum
    hjarta+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: hjartans
    hjarta+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: hjørtuni
    hjarta+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: hjørtuni
    hjarta+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: hjørtunum
    hjarta+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: hjartnanna
